Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3502.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 583.215, is amended to read: 583.215 EXPIRATION. Sections 336.9-601, subsections (h) and (i); 550.365; 559.209; 582.039; and 583.20 to 583.32, expire June 30, deleted text begin 2027deleted text end new text begin 2032new text end .